New York, session 2025-2026, A10760.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that the enactment of these appropriations provides sufficient 3 authority to the comptroller for the purpose of making payments for the 4 purposes described herein until such time as appropriation bills submit- 5 ted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the state constitution 6 for the support of government for the state fiscal year beginning April 7 1, 2026 are enacted. 8 § 2. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 9 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 10 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 11 public officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be 12 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 13 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 14 For the purpose of making payments for 15 personal service, including liabilities 16 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the 17 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 18 period April 1 through April 7, 2026 to 19 state officers and employees of the execu- 20 tive branch. This appropriation also 21 includes payments for services performed 22 by mentally ill or developmentally disa- 23 bled persons who are employed in state-op- 24 erated special employment, work-for-pay or 25 sheltered workshop programs ................ 247,904,000 26 -------------- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12026-01-6 A. 10760 2 1 § 3. The amount specified in this section, or so much thereof as shall 2 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, is hereby appropri- 3 ated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the public 4 officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be available 5 for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 6 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 7 For the payment of state operations non 8 personal service liabilities to the execu- 9 tive branch, including the comptroller, 10 and the attorney general, incurred in the 11 ordinary course of business, during the 12 period April 1 through April 7, 2026, 13 pursuant to existing state law and for 14 purposes for which the legislature author- 15 ized the expenditure of moneys during the 16 2025-2026 state fiscal year; provided, 17 however, that nothing contained herein 18 shall be deemed to limit or restrict the 19 power or authority of state departments or 20 agencies to conduct their activities or 21 operations in accordance with existing 22 law, and further provided that nothing 23 contained herein shall be deemed to super- 24 sede, nullify or modify the provisions of 25 section 40 of the state finance law 26 prescribing when appropriations made for 27 the 2025-2026 state fiscal year shall have 28 ceased to have force and effect ............. 10,000,000 29 -------------- 30 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 31 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 32 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 33 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 34 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 35 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 36 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 37 STATE OPERATIONS 38 GENERAL STATE CHARGES ...................................... 22,525,000 39 -------------- 40 General Fund 41 State Purposes Account - 10050 42 For employee fringe benefits according to 43 the following project schedule including 44 those benefits which are related to 45 employees paid from funds, accounts, or 46 programs where the division of the budget 47 has issued waivers .......................... 22,525,000 A. 10760 3 1 Project Schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 -------------------------------------------- 4 For the state's contribution 5 to the social security 6 contribution fund ............. 21,500,000 7 For the payment of the metro- 8 politan commuter transporta- 9 tion mobility tax pursuant 10 to article 23 of the tax 11 law, as added by chapter 25 12 of the laws of 2009, on 13 behalf of the state employ- 14 ees employed in the metro- 15 politan commuter transporta- 16 tion district .................... 675,000 17 For the state's share of 18 contributions to the volun- 19 tary defined contribution 20 plan made on behalf of 21 eligible employees pursuant 22 to chapter 18 of the laws of 23 2012 who elect to partic- 24 ipate in such plan and who 25 are not otherwise eligible 26 to participate in the SUNY 27 optional retirement program ...... 350,000 28 -------------- 29 Project schedule total .... 22,525,000 30 -------------- 31 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 32 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 33 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 34 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 35 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 36 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 37 AID TO LOCALITIES 38 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM .......................... 6,420,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 42 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 43 For various federal food and nutritional 44 services. The moneys hereby appropriated 45 shall be available for payment of finan- 46 cial assistance heretofore accrued (26986) ... 6,420,000 47 -------------- 48 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ................................. 609,931,000 49 -------------- A. 10760 4 1 General Fund 2 Local Assistance Account - 10000 3 For the medical assistance program, includ- 4 ing administrative expenses, for local 5 social services districts, and for medical 6 care rates for authorized child care agen- 7 cies. 8 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 9 finance law or any provision of law to the 10 contrary, subject to federal approval, 11 department of health state funds medicaid 12 spending, excluding payments for medical 13 services provided at state facilities 14 operated by the office of mental health, 15 the office for people with developmental 16 disabilities and the office of addiction 17 services and supports and further exclud- 18 ing any payments which are not appropri- 19 ated within the department of health, in 20 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 21 2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not 22 exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided 23 below provided, however, such aggregate 24 limits may be adjusted by the director of 25 the budget to account for any changes in 26 the New York state federal medical assist- 27 ance percentage amount established pursu- 28 ant to the federal social security act, 29 increases in provider revenues, reductions 30 in local social services district payments 31 for medical assistance administration, 32 minimum wage increases, and beginning 33 April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the 34 New York state medical indemnity fund, 35 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 36 2011, and state costs or savings from the 37 essential plan program. Such projections 38 may be adjusted by the director of the 39 budget to account for increased or expe- 40 dited department of health state funds 41 medicaid expenditures as a result of a 42 natural or other type of disaster, includ- 43 ing a governmental declaration of emergen- 44 cy. 45 The director of the budget, in consultation 46 with the commissioner of health, shall 47 assess on a quarterly basis known and 48 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 49 ry of service and by geographic region, as 50 defined by the commissioner, incurred both 51 prior to and subsequent to such assessment 52 for each such period, and if the director 53 of the budget determines that such expend- 54 itures are expected to cause medicaid 55 spending for such period to exceed the A. 10760 5 1 aggregate limit specified herein for such 2 period, the state medicaid director, in 3 consultation with the director of the 4 budget and the commissioner of health, 5 shall develop a medicaid savings allo- 6 cation adjustment to limit such spending 7 to the aggregate limit specified herein 8 for such period. 9 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 10 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 11 tures authorized by the appropriations 12 herein in compliance with the following 13 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 14 in compliance with applicable federal law, 15 including the provisions of the Patient 16 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 17 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 18 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 19 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 20 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent 21 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 22 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 23 made in a manner that complies with the 24 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- 25 al centers for medicare and medicaid 26 services, provided, however, that the 27 commissioner of health is authorized to 28 submit any state plan amendment or seek 29 other federal approval, including waiver 30 authority, to implement the provisions of 31 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 32 that meets the other criteria set forth 33 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 34 manner that maximizes federal financial 35 participation, to the extent practicable, 36 including any federal financial partic- 37 ipation that is available or is reasonably 38 expected to become available, in the 39 discretion of the commissioner, under the 40 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 41 be made uniformly among categories of 42 services and geographic regions of the 43 state, to the extent practicable, and 44 shall be made uniformly within a category 45 of service, to the extent practicable, 46 except where the commissioner determines 47 that there are sufficient grounds for 48 non-uniformity, including but not limited 49 to: the extent to which specific catego- 50 ries of services contributed to department 51 of health medicaid state funds spending in 52 excess of the limits specified herein; the 53 need to maintain safety net services in 54 underserved communities; or the potential 55 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 56 models contemplated by the Affordable Care A. 10760 6 1 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 2 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 3 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 4 shall be made in a manner that does not 5 unnecessarily create administrative 6 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 7 ents or providers. 8 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 9 legislature, as well as organizations 10 representing health care providers, 11 consumers, businesses, workers, health 12 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 13 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 14 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 15 all or part of such adjustment, in the 16 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 17 to have a material impact on the overall 18 medicaid program, particular categories of 19 service or particular geographic regions 20 of the state. 21 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 22 savings allocation adjustment on the 23 department of health's website and shall 24 provide written copies of such adjustment 25 to the chairs of the senate finance and 26 the assembly ways and means committees at 27 least 30 days before the date on which 28 implementation is expected to begin. 29 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 30 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 31 to the provisions of notice and prior to 32 implementation but needs to provide a new 33 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 34 this paragraph only if the commissioner 35 determines, in his or her discretion, that 36 such revisions materially alter the 37 adjustment. 38 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 39 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 40 commissioner need not seek the input 41 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 42 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 43 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 44 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 45 development and implementation of a medi- 46 caid savings allocation adjustment is 47 necessary due to a public health emergen- 48 cy. 49 For purposes of this section, a public 50 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 51 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 52 significantly increases the immediate need 53 for health care personnel in an area of 54 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 55 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 56 serious communicable disease, or the A. 10760 7 1 potential for such widespread risk of 2 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 3 condition determined by the commissioner 4 to constitute an imminent threat to public 5 health. 6 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 7 prevent all or part of such medicaid 8 savings allocation adjustment from taking 9 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 10 ted by the federal centers for medicare 11 and medicaid services. 12 In accordance with the medicaid savings 13 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 14 the department of health shall reduce 15 department of health state funds medicaid 16 spending by the amount of the projected 17 overspending through, actions including, 18 but not limited to modifying or suspending 19 reimbursement methods, including but not 20 limited to all fees, premium levels and 21 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 22 provision of law that sets a specific 23 amount or methodology for any such 24 payments or rates of payment; modifying or 25 discontinuing medicaid program benefits; 26 seeking all necessary federal approvals, 27 including, but not limited to waivers, 28 waiver amendments; and suspending time 29 frames for notice, approval or certif- 30 ication of rate requirements, notwith- 31 standing any provision of law, rule or 32 regulation to the contrary, including but 33 not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of 34 the public health law, section 18 of chap- 35 ter 2 of the laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 36 505.14(h). 37 The department of health shall prepare a 38 quarterly report that sets forth: (a) 39 known and projected department of health 40 medicaid expenditures as described in 41 subdivision (1) of this section, and 42 factors that could result in medicaid 43 disbursements for the relevant state 44 fiscal year to exceed the projected 45 department of health state funds disburse- 46 ments in the enacted budget financial plan 47 pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of 48 the state finance law, including spending 49 increases or decreases due to: enrollment 50 fluctuations, rate changes, utilization 51 changes, MRT investments, and shift of 52 beneficiaries to managed care; and vari- 53 ations in offline medicaid payments; and 54 (b) the actions taken to implement any 55 medicaid savings allocation adjustment 56 implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of A. 10760 8 1 this section, including information 2 concerning the impact of such actions on 3 each category of service and each 4 geographic region of the state. Each such 5 quarterly report shall be provided to the 6 chairs of the senate finance and the 7 assembly ways and means committees and 8 shall be posted on the department of 9 health's website in a timely manner. 10 The money hereby appropriated is to be 11 available for payment of aid heretofore 12 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 13 palities, and to providers of medical 14 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 15 social services law, and for payment of 16 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 17 ers of family care where payment systems 18 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 19 operational. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 21 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 22 by the department for outside legal 23 assistance on issues involving the federal 24 government, the conduct of preadmission 25 screening and annual resident reviews 26 required by the state's medicaid program, 27 computer matching with insurance carriers 28 to insure that medicaid is the payer of 29 last resort and activities related to the 30 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 31 able under the medicaid program. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 34 the social services law, or payments of 35 federal funds otherwise due to the local 36 social services districts for programs 37 provided under the federal social security 38 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 39 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 40 by the state commissioner of temporary and 41 disability assistance or the state commis- 42 sioner of health as due from local social 43 services districts each month as their 44 share of payments made pursuant to section 45 367-b of the social services law may be 46 set aside by the state comptroller in an 47 interest-bearing account in order to 48 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 49 providers under section 367-b of the 50 social services law pursuant to an esti- 51 mate provided by the commissioner of 52 health of each local social services 53 district's share of payments made pursuant 54 to section 367-b of the social services 55 law. A. 10760 9 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 2 of law, funding made available by these 3 appropriations shall support direct salary 4 costs and related fringe benefits within 5 the medical assistance program associated 6 with any minimum wage increase that takes 7 effect during the timeframe of these 8 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 9 the labor law. Each eligible organization 10 in receipt of funding made available by 11 these appropriations may be required to 12 submit written certification, in such form 13 and at such time the commissioner may 14 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 15 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 16 tion, how such funding will be or was used 17 for purposes eligible under these appro- 18 priations and any other reporting deemed 19 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 20 appropriated herein may include advances 21 to organizations authorized to receive 22 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 24 the money hereby appropriated may be 25 increased or decreased by interchange or 26 transfer, with any appropriation of the 27 department of health and the office of 28 medicaid inspector general and may be 29 increased or decreased by transfer or 30 suballocation between these appropriated 31 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 32 ment of health state purpose account, the 33 office of mental health, office for people 34 with developmental disabilities, the 35 office of addiction services and supports, 36 the department of family assistance office 37 of temporary and disability assistance, 38 the department of corrections and communi- 39 ty supervision, the office of information 40 technology services, the state university 41 of New York, and office of children and 42 family services, the office of medicaid 43 inspector general, the state education 44 department, and the state office for the 45 aging with the approval of the director of 46 the budget, who shall file such approval 47 with the department of audit and control 48 and copies thereof with the chairman of 49 the senate finance committee and the 50 chairman of the assembly ways and means 51 committee. 52 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 53 of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby 54 appropriated may be used for payments to 55 the centers for medicaid and medicare 56 services for obligations incurred related A. 10760 10 1 to the pharmaceutical costs of dually 2 eligible medicare/medicaid beneficiaries 3 participating in the medicare drug benefit 4 authorized by P.L. 108-173. 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 6 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated 7 shall not be used for any existing rates, 8 fees, fee schedule, or procedures which 9 may affect the cost of care and services 10 provided by personal care providers, case 11 managers, health maintenance organiza- 12 tions, out of state medical facilities 13 which provide care and services to resi- 14 dents of the state, providers of transpor- 15 tation services, that are altered, 16 amended, adjusted or otherwise changed by 17 a local social services district unless 18 previously approved by the department of 19 health and the director of the budget. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 21 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 22 made available to the commissioner of the 23 office of mental health or the commission- 24 er of the office of addiction services and 25 supports, in consultation with the commis- 26 sioner of health and approved by the 27 director of the budget, and consistent 28 with appropriations made therefor, to 29 implement allocation adjustment developed 30 by each such commissioner which shall 31 describe mental health or substance use 32 disorder services that should be developed 33 to meet service needs resulting from the 34 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 35 services provided under the medicaid 36 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 37 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 38 law. Such programs may include programs 39 that are licensed pursuant to both article 40 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 41 28 of the public health law, or certified 42 under both article 32 of the mental 43 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 44 health law. 45 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 46 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 47 be available for payments associated with 48 the resolution by settlement agreement or 49 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 50 where the department of health is a party. 51 For services and expenses of the medical 52 assistance program including hospital 53 inpatient services and general hospitals 54 that are safety-net providers that evince 55 severe financial distress, pursuant to 56 criteria determined by the commissioner, A. 10760 11 1 shall be eligible for awards for amounts 2 appropriated herein, to enable such 3 providers to maintain operations and vital 4 services while establishing long term 5 solutions to achieve sustainable health 6 services. 7 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 8 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 9 the medical assistance program for any 10 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 11 without the approval of the director of 12 the budget. 13 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 14 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 15 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 16 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 17 reappropriation for this item covering 18 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 19 ation for this item covering fiscal year 20 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 21 laws of 2025 (26947) ........................ 24,238,000 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including hospital 24 outpatient and emergency room services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26948) ......................... 7,249,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including clinic 36 services. 37 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 38 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 39 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 40 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 41 reappropriation for this item covering 42 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 43 ation for this item covering fiscal year 44 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 45 laws of 2025 (26949) ........................ 14,198,000 46 For services and expenses of the medical 47 assistance program including nursing home 48 services. 49 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 50 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 51 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 52 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 53 reappropriation for this item covering 54 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 55 ation for this item covering fiscal year A. 10760 12 1 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 2 laws of 2025 (26950) ........................ 35,685,000 3 For services and expenses of the medical 4 assistance program including other long 5 term care services. 6 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 7 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 8 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 9 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 10 reappropriation for this item covering 11 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 12 ation for this item covering fiscal year 13 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 14 laws of 2025 (26951) ....................... 169,986,000 15 For services and expenses of the medical 16 assistance program including managed care 17 services including regional planning 18 activities of the finger lakes health 19 systems agency, including statewide coor- 20 dination and demonstration of best prac- 21 tices. The department shall make grants 22 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 23 assure high-quality and accessible primary 24 care, to provide technical assistance to 25 support financial and business planning 26 for integrated systems of care, and to 27 assist primary care providers in the 28 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 29 use of electronic health record technolo- 30 gy. 31 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 32 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 33 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 34 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 35 reappropriation for this item covering 36 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 37 ation for this item covering fiscal year 38 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 39 laws of 2025 (26952) ....................... 155,710,000 40 For services and expenses for health homes 41 including grants to health homes. 42 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 43 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 44 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 45 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 46 reappropriation for this item covering 47 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 48 ation for this item covering fiscal year 49 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 50 laws of 2025 (29548) ......................... 3,770,000 51 For services and expenses of the medical 52 assistance program including pharmacy 53 services provided, however, that no funds 54 shall be made available pursuant to this 55 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 56 authorized in any enacted law, rule, or A. 10760 13 1 regulation without approval from the 2 director of the budget. 3 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 4 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 5 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 6 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 7 reappropriation for this item covering 8 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 9 ation for this item covering fiscal year 10 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 11 laws of 2025 (26953) ........................ 71,926,000 12 For services and expenses of the medical 13 assistance program including transporta- 14 tion services. 15 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 16 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 17 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 18 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 19 reappropriation for this item covering 20 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 21 ation for this item covering fiscal year 22 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 23 laws of 2025 (26954) ........................ 10,332,000 24 For services and expenses of the medical 25 assistance program including dental 26 services. 27 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 28 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 29 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 30 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 31 reappropriation for this item covering 32 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 33 ation for this item covering fiscal year 34 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 35 laws of 2025 (26955) ............................ 79,000 36 For services and expenses of the medical 37 assistance program including non-institu- 38 tional and other spending. 39 The money hereby appropriated is available 40 for payment of liabilities heretofore 41 accrued or hereafter accrued. 42 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 43 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 44 be available for payments to any county or 45 public school districts associated with 46 additional claims for school supportive 47 health services. 48 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 49 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 50 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 51 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 52 reappropriation for this item covering 53 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 54 ation for this item covering fiscal year 55 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 56 laws of 2025 (26956) ........................ 20,604,000 A. 10760 14 1 For services and expenses of the medical 2 assistance program including medical 3 services provided at state facilities 4 operated by the office of mental health, 5 the office for people with developmental 6 disabilities and the office of addiction 7 services and supports. 8 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 9 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 10 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 11 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 12 reappropriation for this item covering 13 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 14 ation for this item covering fiscal year 15 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 16 laws of 2025 (26961) ........................ 96,154,000 17 -------------- 18 § 6. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 19 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 20 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 21 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 22 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 23 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 24 AID TO LOCALITIES 25 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ..................... 135,000,000 26 -------------- 27 Enterprise Funds 28 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund 29 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650 30 For payment of unemployment insurance bene- 31 fits pursuant to article 18 of the labor 32 law or as authorized by the federal 33 government through the disaster unemploy- 34 ment assistance program, the emergency 35 unemployment compensation program, the 36 extended benefit program, the federal 37 additional compensation program or any 38 other federally funded unemployment bene- 39 fit program (34787) ........................ 135,000,000 40 -------------- 41 § 7. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 42 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 43 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 44 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 45 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. A. 10760 15 1 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE 2 OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES 3 AID TO LOCALITIES 4 COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM .................................. 10,098,000 5 -------------- 6 General Fund 7 Local Assistance Account - 10000 8 For services and expenses of the community 9 services program, net of disallowances, 10 for community programs for people with 11 developmental disabilities pursuant to 12 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 13 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 14 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 15 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 16 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 17 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and 18 other provisions of the mental hygiene 19 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 20 provision of law, the following appropri- 21 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 22 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 23 credits. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 25 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 26 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 27 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 28 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 29 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 30 and approved by the director of the budg- 31 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 32 available to reimburse or advance locali- 33 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for 34 expenditures made during local fiscal 35 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 36 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 37 for the 3 month period beginning January 38 1, 2027. 39 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 40 of the mental hygiene law or any other 41 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 42 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 43 such contract and in the manner provided 44 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 45 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 46 cies arising out of loans which are funded 47 from the proceeds of bonds and notes 48 issued by the dormitory authority of the 49 state of New York. 50 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 51 the money hereby appropriated may be A. 10760 16 1 transferred to state operations and/or any 2 appropriation of the office for people 3 with developmental disabilities with the 4 approval of the director of the budget. 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 6 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 7 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 8 of the net deficit costs of day training 9 programs and family support services. 10 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 11 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 12 other inconsistent provision of law, with 13 relation to the operation of certified 14 family care homes, including family care 15 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 16 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 17 ation may be used for payments to purchase 18 general services including but not limited 19 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 20 14 days, at rates to be established by the 21 commissioner and approved by the director 22 of the budget in consideration of factors 23 including, but not limited to, geographic 24 area and number of clients cared for in 25 the home and for payment in an amount 26 determined by the commissioner for the 27 personal needs of each client residing in 28 the family care home. 29 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 30 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 31 law and any other inconsistent provision 32 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 33 be used for expenses of family care homes 34 including payments to operators of certi- 35 fied family care homes for damages caused 36 by clients to personal and real property 37 in accordance with standards established 38 by the commissioner and approved by the 39 director of the budget. 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 41 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 42 be used for appropriate day program 43 services and residential services includ- 44 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 45 subsidies to individuals, start-up 46 expenses for family care providers, envi- 47 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 48 ogies, appraisals, property options, 49 feasibility studies and preoperational 50 expenses. 51 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 52 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 53 be used to fund continuity of care 54 services, family reimbursed respite, other 55 than personal services and direct housing 56 subsidies for people who are enrolled in A. 10760 17 1 OPWDD's self-direction program, provided 2 any or all such costs are identified in a 3 self-direction budget approved by OPWDD. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 5 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the 6 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 7 targeted inflationary increase, for the 8 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 9 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 10 shall not apply any other inflationary 11 increases, cost of living type increases, 12 inflation factors, or trend factors for 13 the purpose of establishing rates of 14 payments, contracts or any other form of 15 reimbursement; provided that this shall 16 not prevent the commissioner from applying 17 prior adjustments for the purpose of 18 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 19 ing of base year costs. 20 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 21 tion law and any other provision of law, 22 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 23 support staff in programs certified or 24 approved by the office for people with 25 developmental disabilities, including the 26 home and community based services waiver 27 programs that the office for people with 28 developmental disabilities is authorized 29 to administer with federal approval pursu- 30 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 31 the federal social security act, are 32 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 33 may specify when performed under the 34 supervision, training and periodic 35 inspection of a registered professional 36 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 37 practitioner's ordered care. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, and consistent with 40 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 41 the directors of facilities licensed but 42 not operated by the office for people with 43 developmental disabilities who act as 44 federally-appointed representative payees 45 and who assume management responsibility 46 over the funds of a resident may continue 47 to use such funds for the cost of the 48 resident's care and treatment, consistent 49 with federal law and regulations. 50 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 51 in accordance with the following: 52 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 53 to the contrary, funds appropriated herein 54 are available to reimburse in- and 55 out-of-state private residential schools, 56 pursuant to subdivision (c) of section A. 10760 18 1 13.37-a and subdivision (g) of section 2 13.38 of the mental hygiene law, for costs 3 of supporting the residential and day 4 program services available to individuals 5 who are over the age of 21 years of age, 6 provided that the amount paid for residen- 7 tial services and/or maintenance costs is 8 net of any supplemental security income 9 benefit to which the individual receiving 10 services is eligible, and provided further 11 that funding for nonresidential services 12 will be in an amount not to exceed the 13 maximum reimbursement for appropriate day 14 services delivered by the office for 15 people with developmental disabilities 16 certified or approved providers other than 17 in- and out-of-state private residential 18 schools, unless otherwise authorized by 19 the director of the budget. 20 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 21 finance law, section 142 of the economic 22 development law, and article 41 of the 23 mental hygiene law, the commissioner of 24 the office for people with developmental 25 disabilities may make the funds appropri- 26 ated herein available as state aid, a loan 27 or a grant, pursuant to terms and condi- 28 tions established by the commissioner of 29 the office for people with developmental 30 disabilities, to cover a portion of the 31 development costs of private, public 32 and/or non-profit organizations, including 33 corporations and partnerships established 34 pursuant to the private housing finance 35 law and/or any other statutory provisions, 36 for supportive housing units that have 37 been set aside for individuals with intel- 38 lectual and developmental disabilities. 39 Further, the office for people with devel- 40 opmental disabilities shall have a lien on 41 the real property developed with such 42 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be 43 in the amount of the loan or grant, for a 44 maximum term of 30 years, or other longer 45 term consistent with the requirements of 46 another regulatory agency. 47 For services and expenses related to the 48 provision of residential services to 49 people with developmental disabilities 50 (37802) ...................................... 5,862,000 51 For services and expenses related to the 52 provision of day program services to 53 people with developmental disabilities 54 (37803) ...................................... 1,440,000 55 For services and expenses related to the 56 provision of family support services to A. 10760 19 1 people with developmental disabilities 2 (37804) ...................................... 1,620,000 3 For services and expenses related to the 4 provision of workshop, day training and 5 employment services to people with devel- 6 opmental disabilities. Notwithstanding any 7 other provision of law, up to $13,800 of 8 this appropriation may be transferred to 9 the New York State Education Departments' 10 Adult Career and Continuing Education 11 Services - Vocational Rehabilitation 12 (ACCES-VR) program to support the LongTerm 13 Sheltered Employment program operated by 14 FEDCAP Rehabilitation Services, Inc. 15 (37805) ........................................ 936,000 16 For other services and expenses provided to 17 people with developmental disabilities 18 including but not limited to hepatitis B, 19 care at home waiver, epilepsy services, 20 Special Olympics New York, Inc. and volun- 21 tary fingerprinting (37806) .................... 240,000 22 -------------- 23 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 24 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 25 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 26 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 27 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 28 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES 29 AID TO LOCALITIES 30 VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM ............................. 36,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund 34 Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204 35 For services and expenses related to home- 36 less veterans' housing (54815) .................. 36,000 37 § 9. No expenditure may be made from any appropriation in this act, 38 until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director of the 39 budget and a copy of such certificate shall have been filed with the 40 state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 41 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee provided, however, 42 that any expenditures from any appropriation in this act made by the 43 legislature or judiciary shall not require such certificate. 44 § 10. All expenditures and disbursements made against the appropri- 45 ations in this act shall, upon final action by the legislature on appro- 46 priation bills submitted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the 47 state constitution for the support of government for the state fiscal 48 year beginning April 1, 2026, be transferred by the comptroller as A. 10760 20 1 expenditures and disbursements to such appropriations for all state 2 departments and agencies, as applicable, in amounts equal to the amounts 3 charged against the appropriations in this act for each such department, 4 agency, and the legislature and the judiciary. 5 § 11. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdi- 6 vision, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 7 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 8 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 9 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 10 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 11 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 12 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 13 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 14 § 12. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 15 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026; provided, 16 however, that upon the transfer of expenditures and disbursements by the 17 comptroller as provided in section ten of this act, the appropriations 18 made by this act and subject to such section shall be deemed repealed.